Nebraska, session 109, LB791.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB791 LB791
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 49-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
49-1401 Sections 49-1401 to 49-14,142 and section 2 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Political Accountability
and Disclosure Act.
Sec. 2. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, no person shall make one or
more contributions to a candidate or ballot question committee totaling
more than three thousand five hundred dollars during an election period.
A candidate or ballot question committee shall, within ten days after
receipt, refund any contribution from a person which exceeds a total of
three thousand five hundred dollars received during an election period
from such person and report such contribution on subsequent campaign
statements disclosing the name and address of the contributor, the amount
received, the date of receipt, and the date returned. This section does
not apply to a candidate's own personal funds contributed to that
candidate's candidate committee.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2029, and every two years thereafter, the
limitation provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall be
adjusted to be equal to the then current limitation adjusted by the
cumulative percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers published by the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics for the
two-year period preceding the adjustment date. The amount shall be
rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars.
(3) For purposes of this section, election period means the calendar
year of the election.
Sec. 3. Original section 49-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-